apertium-sl-es.sl.dix
   <pardef n="lunin__adj">
     <!-- m -->
      <e>       <p><l></l>           <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ega</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>emu</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ega</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>           <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>em</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>im</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>a</l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ih</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ima</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>a</l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ih</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ima</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>i</l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ih</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>im</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>e</l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ih</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>imi</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>

	<!-- f -->
      <e>       <p><l>a</l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>e</l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>i</l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>o</l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>i</l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>o</l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>i</l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ih</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ima</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>i</l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ih</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ima</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>e</l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ih</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>im</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>e</l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ih</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>imi</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>

	<!-- nt -->
      <e>       <p><l>o</l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ega</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>emu</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>o</l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>em</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>im</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>i</l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ih</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ima</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>i</l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ih</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ima</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>a</l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ih</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>im</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>a</l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ih</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>imi</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

	<e lm="lunin">           <i>lunin</i><par n="lunin__adj"/></e>
